Illinois, session 104th, HB3109.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Commerce and Economic 5Opportunity Law of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois 6is amended by changing Section 605-1055 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 605/605-1055)8    Sec. 605-1055. Illinois SBIR/STTR Matching Funds Program.9    (a) There is established the Illinois Small Business 10Innovation Research (SBIR) and Small Business Technology 11Transfer (STTR) Matching Funds Program to be administered by 12the Department. In order to foster job creation and economic 13development in the State, the Department may make grants to 14eligible businesses to match funds received by the business as 15an SBIR or STTR Phase I award and to encourage businesses to 16apply for Phase II awards. 17    (b) In order to be eligible for a grant under this Section, 18a business must satisfy all of the following conditions: 19        (1) The business must be a for-profit, Illinois-based 20    business. For the purposes of this Section, an 21    Illinois-based business is one that has its principal 22    place of business in this State; 23        (2) The business must have received an SBIR/STTR Phase   HB3109 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 11458 HLH 21546 b1    I award from a participating federal agency in response to 2    a specific federal solicitation. To receive the full 3    match, the business must also have submitted a final Phase 4    I report, demonstrated that the sponsoring agency has 5    interest in the Phase II proposal, and submitted a Phase 6    II proposal to the agency. 7        (3) The business must satisfy all federal SBIR/STTR 8    requirements. 9        (4) The business shall not receive concurrent funding 10    support from other sources that duplicates the purpose of 11    this Section. 12        (5) The business must certify that at least 51% of the 13    research described in the federal SBIR/STTR Phase II 14    proposal will be conducted in this State and that the 15    business will remain an Illinois-based business for the 16    duration of the SBIR/STTR Phase II project. 17        (6) The business must demonstrate its ability to 18    conduct research in its SBIR/STTR Phase II proposal. 19    (c) The Department may award grants to match the funds 20received by a business through an SBIR/STTR Phase I proposal 21up to a maximum of $75,000 $50,000. Seventy-five percent of 22the total grant shall be remitted to the business upon receipt 23of the SBIR/STTR Phase I award and application for funds under 24this Section. Twenty-five percent of the total grant shall be 25remitted to the business upon submission by the business of 26the Phase II application to the funding agency and acceptance   HB3109 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 11458 HLH 21546 b1of the Phase I report by the funding agency. A business may 2receive only one grant under this subsection Section per year. 3A business may receive only one grant under this subsection 4Section with respect to each federal proposal submission. Over 5its lifetime, a business may receive a maximum of 5 awards 6under this subsection Section. 7    (c-5) The Department may, subject to appropriation, award 8grants to match the funds received by a business through an 9SBIR/STTR Phase II proposal up to a maximum of $250,000. Fifty 10percent of the total grant shall be remitted to the business 11upon receipt of the SBIR/STTR Phase II award and application 12for funds under this Section. Fifty percent of the total grant 13shall be remitted to the business upon submission by the 14business of the Phase II final report to the federal funding 15agency. A business may receive only one grant under this 16subsection per year. A business may receive only one grant 17under this subsection with respect to each federal proposal 18submission. Over its lifetime, a business may receive a 19maximum of 2 awards under this subsection. 20    (d) A business shall apply, under oath, to the Department 21for a grant under this Section on a form prescribed by the 22Department that includes at least all of the following: 23        (1) the name of the business, the form of business 24    organization under which it is operated, and the names and 25    addresses of the principals or management of the business; 26        (2) an acknowledgment of receipt of the Phase I report   HB3109 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 11458 HLH 21546 b1    and Phase II proposal by the relevant federal agency; and 2        (3) any other information necessary for the Department 3    to evaluate the application.4(Source: P.A. 101-657, eff. 3-23-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22.)